src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_IMP_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - N - gwekishin - IMP :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Del+2: gwekishinkan
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: gwekishinkag
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Imm+2: gwekishinn
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: gwekishindaa
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: gwekishing
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Proh+2: gwekishinken
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+1+Pl: gwekishinsiidaa
     gwekishin+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+Pl: gwekishinkegon
     
